California, session 20252026, AB440.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 92.8 is added to the Streets and Highways Code, to read:92.8. (a) (1) On or before July 1, 2028, the department shall identify best practices for the implementation of suicide countermeasures designed to deter suicide attempts on bridges and overpasses.(2) In evaluating appropriate physical infrastructure, design features, and related deterrent measures, the department shall consider feedback from local jurisdictions and other stakeholders.(3) Any countermeasures implemented pursuant to this section shall be as determined by the department to be appropriate.(b) The department shall consult with the State Department of Public Health, behavioral health experts, and other relevant stakeholders in implementing this section.(c) This section does not impose a mandatory duty pursuant to Section 815.6 of the Government Code.